Utah statutes.
63G-6-424 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Counties and municipalities eligible to participate in state agreements, contracts, and surplus property program.

Utah counties, municipalities, and local public procurement units may purchase from or otherwise participate in state public procurement unit agreements and contracts.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

